Utah statutes.
39-6-7.   Apprehension.

(1)  "Apprehension" means the taking of a person into custody by competent authority, with or without a warrant.

(2)  A person authorized under this chapter or rules made under it to apprehend persons subject to this chapter, any provost marshal of a military court appointed under this chapter, and any peace officer authorized by law, may apprehend persons subject to this chapter upon probable cause to believe that an offense has been committed and the person to be apprehended committed the offense.

(3)  Commissioned officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers may quell disorderly conduct among persons subject to this chapter and may apprehend those persons who are taking part.

